en: Microwave meals, TV dinners, prepackaged meals, ready-made meals, ready meals
ca: Aliments per microones
de: Mikrowellengerichte
es: Comidas para microondas
fi: mikroaaltouuniateriat
fr: plats préparés à réchauffer au micro-ondes, plats préparés au micro-onde, plat-préparé au micro-onde, plat au micro-onde, plats à réchauffer au micro-onde
he: מנות למיקרוגל, מנות מיקרוגל, מנות לחימום במיקרוגל, מנות מיקרו
hr: Mikrovalna jela
hu: Mikrohullámozható ételek, Előre elkészített ételek, Késszételek
it: Piatti pronti
ja: 電子レンジ用のレトルト食品
lt: Pašildomi patiekalai, pusgaminiai, Patiekalai prie TV
nl: Magnetronmaaltijden
pt: Refeições para micro-ondas
ru: Разогреваемые готовые обеды
zh: 微波食品

en: Pots, Box
fr: Box
hr: Lonci
nl: Dozen

en: Instant pasta, Pasta in a box
de: Fertignudeln
es: Pasta instantánea
fi: pikapasta
fr: Pâtes instantanées, Box de pâtes
hr: Instant tjestenina
lt: Greito paruošimo makaronai
nl: Instant pasta

en: Instant udon
fr: Udon instantanés
hr: Instant udon
lt: Greito paruošimo udon makaronai

en: Instant soba
fr: Soba instantanés
hr: Instant soba
lt: Greito paruošimo soba makaronai
nl: Instant soba

en: Instant pasta with chicken, Pasta box with chicken
fr: Pâtes instantanées au poulet, Box de pâtes au poulet
hr: Instant tjestenina s piletinom
lt: Greito paruošimo makaronai su vištiena
nl: Instant pasta met kip

en: Instant pasta with cheese, Pasta box with cheese
fr: Pâtes instantanées au fromage, Box de pâtes au fromage
hr: Instant tjestenina sa sirom
lt: Greito paruošimo makaronai su sūriu

en: Pasta with cheese sauce
fr: Pâtes en sauce aux fromages
hr: Tjestenina s umakom od sira
lt: Makaronai su sūrio padažu

en: spaghetti with cheese sauce
fr: spaghetti en sauce aux fromages
hr: Špageti s umakom od sira
lt: Spageti su sūrio padažu

en: tagliatelle with cheese sauce
fr: tagliatelle en sauce aux fromages

en: Instant pasta with beef, Pasta box with beef
fr: Pâtes instantanées au boeuf, Box de pâtes au boeuf
hr: Instant tjestenina s govedinom
lt: Greito paruošimo makaronai su jautiena

en: Rice in pots, Rice in a box
fr: Box de riz
hr: Riža u loncima
nl: Rijst in een doos

en: Vegetable pots, Vegetables in a box
fr: Box de légumes

en: Knödel
fr: Knödel

en: Frozen knödel
fr: Knödel surgelés

en: Fish quenelles
es: Quenelles de pescado
fr: Quenelles de poisson
hr: Riblje quenelles
it: Quenelle di pesce, Polpette di pesce
nl: Visquenelle

en: Fish quenelle in sauce
fr: Quenelle de poisson en sauce

en: Fish quenelle
fr: Quenelle de poisson

en: Pike quenelles
fr: Quenelles de brochet
hr: Pike quenelles
it: Quenelle di luccio, Polpette di luccio
nl: Snoekquenelles

en: Salmon quenelles
fr: Quenelles de saumon
hr: Losos quenelles
nl: Zalmquenelle